Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 284.300 to
284.375.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Film and Video Office shall develop and implement a Creative
Opportunity Program to make payments to entities  for the creation and funding of projects
described in subsection (4) of this section that promote the  film, television, interactive, ani-
mation and media industries in Oregon.
(2)(a) The office shall establish by rule the eligibility requirements  and application proc-
ess for entities seeking payments under the program.
(b) The rules must include, at a minimum, application forms, deadlines and  any infor-
mation and documents required to be included with an application, and may prescribe an
application fee.
(3) The office may consult with local  nonprofit organizations, public agencies, educational
institutions, private partners, media production  companies, small businesses and community
organizations when reviewing and approving or rejecting applications for payments under the
program.
(4) The creation and funding of the following projects are eligible for payments under the
program:
(a) Grants for individuals and production projects;
(b) Fund matching;
(c) Investment in development and production;
(d) Mentorship programs;
(e) Project and talent incubation;
(f) Mutual aid;
(g) Creator and storyteller support;
(h) Diversity and inclusion initiatives;
(i) Educational programming;
(j) Workforce development;
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-INTRO) Page 1
(k) Regional production development; and
(L) Industry-related small business growth stimulus.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 284.367 is amended to read:
284.367. (1) The Oregon Production  Investment Fund is established in the State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Oregon Production Investment Fund
shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon Production Investment Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) [ Eighty-nine] Eighty-seven and one-half  percent of moneys in the fund are continuously ap-
propriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for the purposes of making:
(a) Reimbursements to filmmakers  or local media production services companies under ORS
284.368;
(b) Payments to a tax credit  marketer for marketing services provided by the marketer as de-
scribed in ORS 284.369; and
(c) Refunds described in ORS 315.514 (5).
(4) Seven and one-half percent of moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the de-
partment for the purpose of making reimbursements to local  filmmakers or local media production
services companies under ORS 284.368 (3).  Total annual reimbursements to local media production
services companies under this subsection may not exceed seven and one-half percent of the  moneys
deposited annually in the fund. On July 1 of each fiscal year, any moneys that  remain unexpended
or unallocated from the previous fiscal year may be used by the department  for the purpose of
making reimbursements to filmmakers  or local media production services companies under ORS
284.368 (2).
(5) Three percent of moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the department for the
purpose of making payments to filmmakers under ORS 284.368 (4). Total annual  payments to
filmmakers under this subsection may not exceed five percent of the moneys deposited annually in
the fund. On July 1 of each fiscal year, any moneys that remain unexpended  or unallocated from the
previous fiscal year may be used by the department for the purpose of making  payments to
filmmakers under this section. Any excess over five percent that  remains unexpended or unallocated
shall be used by the department for the purpose  of making reimbursements to filmmakers or local
media production services companies under ORS 284.368 (2).
(6) Two percent of  moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department
for the purpose of making payments to entities under  section 2 of this 2022 Act. On July 1
of each fiscal  year, any moneys that remain unexpended or unallocated from the previous
fiscal year may be used by the department for any purpose authorized under this section.
[(6)] (7) Expenditures from the fund are not subject to ORS 291.232 to 291.260.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of  this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 284.367 by section
3 of this 2022 Act become operative on October 1, 2022.
(2) The director of the Oregon Film and Video Office may take any action  before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the di-
rector to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section,
the duties, functions and powers of the director under section 2 of  this 2022 Act and the
amendments to ORS 284.367 by section 3 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House February 17, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-INTRO) Page 3